distr/hunspell/affix/n_patr.aff
SFX 9   0  овичами [^и]мін   #   Веніамін   Веніаміновичами
SFX 9   0  овичах  [^и]мін   #   Веніамін   Веніаміновичах

SFX 9   0 івни  [^и]мін   #   Веніамін   Веніамінівни
SFX 9   0 івен  [^и]мін   #   Веніамін   Веніамінівен
SFX 9   0 івнам  [^и]мін   #   Веніамін   Веніамінівнам
SFX 9   0 івнами  [^и]мін   #   Веніамін   Веніамінівнами
SFX 9   0 івнах [^и]мін   #   Веніамін   Веніамінівнах
